en: Pitted apricot
fr: Abricot dénoyauté
hr: Marelica bez koštice
lt: Abrikosai be kauliukų

en: Frozen pitted apricot
fr: Abricot dénoyauté surgelé

en: Berries, Red berries
de: Beeren
es: Frutas del bosque, Bayas
fi: marjat
fr: Fruits rouges
hr: Bobice
it: Frutti di bosco
lt: Uogos, raudonos uogos
nl: Bosvruchten
pl: Owoce jagodowe
ro: Fructe de pădure
ru: Ягоды

en: Potted berry bushes
sv: Bärbuske i kruka

en: Bilberries
lt: Šilauogės
nl: Bessen

en: Common bilberries
xx: Vaccinium myrtillus
es: Arándanos comunes
la: Vaccinium myrtillus
lt: Paprastosios šilauogės
nl: Blauwe bosbessen

en: Bog bilberries, Northern bilberries
es: Arándanos negros
fr: Myrtilles des marais
hr: Močvarne borovnice
la: Vaccinium uliginosum
lt: Šiaurinės šilauogės
nl: Rijsbessen

en: Blackberries
bg: Къпини
de: Brombeeren
es: Moras
fr: Mûres
it: More
ja: ブラックベリー
lt: Gervuogės
nl: Bramen
ro: Mure

en: Fresh blackberries
fr: Mûres fraîches
hr: Svježe kupine
lt: Šviežios gervuogės

en: Black mulberries, black mulberries
fr: Mûres noires

en: Blackthorns
es: Endrinas
fr: Prunelles
hr: Crnog trna
la: Prunus spinosa
nl: Sleedoornvruchten

en: Blueberries
da: Blåbær
de: Heidelbeeren, Blaubeeren, Heidelbeere
es: Arándanos
fi: mustikat
fr: Myrtilles
hr: Borovnice
it: Mirtilli
ja: ブルーベリー
la: Vaccinium, Cyanococcus
lt: Mėlynės
nl: Bosbessen, Bosbes
ro: Afine
sv: Blåbär

en: Fresh blueberries
da: Friske blåbær
de: Frische Blaubeeren, Frische Heidelbeeren
fr: Myrtilles fraîches
hr: Svježe borovnice
lt: Šviežios mėlynės
nl: Verse bosbessen, Verse blauwe bessen
sv: Färska blåbär

en: Elderberries, Black elders, European elders, European elderberries, European black elderberries, elderberry berries
es: Frutos del saúco negro, Frutos del saúco común, Saúco negro, Saúco común
fr: Baies de sureau noir, Baies de grand sureau, Sureau noir, Grand sureau, Baies de sureau
hr: Bobice bazge
ja: エルダーベリー
lt: Šeivamedžių uogos
nl: Vlierbessen

en: Northern Highbush Blueberries, Blue huckleberries
es: Arándanos azules
fr: Myrtilles arbustives, Grande Myrtille
hr: Sjeverne visokožbunaste borovnice
la: Vaccinium corymbosum
nl: Blauwe bessen

en: Cranberries
bg: Червени боровинки
de: Cranberry, Moosbeeren, Kranbeeren
es: Arándanos agrios
fi: Karpalot
fr: Canneberges
hr: Brusnice
ja: クランベリー
la: Vaccinium oxycoccus
lt: Spanguolės
nl: Cranberries
ro: Merișoare
sv: Tranbär

en: Fresh cranberries
fr: Canneberges fraîches
hr: Svježe brusnice
lt: Šviežios spanguolės

en: Frozen cranberries
bg: Замразени червени боровинки
fr: Canneberges surgelées
hr: Smrznute brusnice

en: Lingonberries, Cowberries
de: Preiselbeeren
es: Arándanos rojos
fi: Puolukat
fr: Airelles, airelle rouge, airelles rouges
la: Vaccinium vitis-idaea
lt: Bruknės
nl: Rode bosbessen, Vossenbessen
sv: Lingon

en: Raspberries, Red raspberries
de: Himbeeren
es: Frambuesas
fi: vadelmat
fr: Framboises
hr: Maline
it: Lamponi
ja: ラズベリー
la: Rubus idaeus
lt: Avietės
nl: Frambozen
ro: Zmeură
sv: Hallon